Hawaii statutes.
[§583A-110] Communication between courts. (a)
A court of this State may communicate with a court in another state concerning
a proceeding arising under this chapter.

(b) The court may allow the parties to
participate in the communication. If the parties are not able to participate
in the communication, they must be given the opportunity to present facts and
legal arguments before a decision on jurisdiction is made.

(c) Communication between courts on schedules,
calendars, court records, and similar matters may occur without informing the
parties. A record need not be made of the communication.

(d) Except as otherwise provided in subsection
(c), a record must be made of a communication under this section. The parties
must be informed promptly of the communication and granted access to the
record.

(e) For the purposes of this section,
"record" means information that is:

(1) Inscribed on a tangible medium; or

(2) Stored in an electronic or other medium;

and is retrievable in perceivable form. It includes
a written summary prepared and approved by the presiding judge and entered into
the court record. [L 2002, c 124, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next